District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.17

Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia and Metropolitan Police Department or other law enforcement officers under section 16-4603.15 or section 16-4603.16 .

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(b)(3), 56 DCR 1572

History

D.C. Law 17-378 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 317 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).

Editor's Notes